Utah, session 2026, HB288.
Section 1. Section 20A-2-208 is enacted to read:20A-2-208. Voter registration forms and information available at Division of Wildlife Resources offices.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Applicant" means an individual who is:(i)seeking to purchase a hunting or fishing license in-person at a Division of Wildlife Resources office; and(ii)eligible to register to vote under Section 20A-2-101 or to preregister to vote under Section 20A-2-101.1.(b)"Voter registration information" means information provided by the lieutenant governor, including:(i)instructions for registering to vote;(ii)voter registration deadlines; and(iii)contact information for questions about voter registration.(2)The lieutenant governor shall provide voter registration forms and voter registration information to each Division of Wildlife Resources office.(3)(a)An applicant may receive a voter registration form when purchasing a hunting or fishing license at a Division of Wildlife Resources office in accordance with this section.(b)A Division of Wildlife Resources office shall:(i)provide voter registration forms and voter registration information to the public; and(ii)direct any questions about voter registration to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor or a county clerk.(4)The Division of Wildlife Resources shall provide a link to the state's online voter registration application to each individual who purchases a hunting or fishing license on the internet.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 20A-2-502 is amended to read:20A-2-502. Statewide voter registration system -- Maintenance and update of system -- Record security -- List of incarcerated felons -- Public document showing compliance by county clerks.(1)The lieutenant governor shall:(a)develop, manage, and maintain a statewide voter registration system to be used by county clerks to maintain an updated statewide voter registration database in accordance with this section and rules made under Section 20A-2-507;(b)except as provided in Subsection (2)(c), regularly update the system with information relevant to voter registration, as follows:(i)on at least a weekly basis, information received from the Driver License Division in relation to:(A)voter registration;(B)a registered voter's change of address; or(C)a registered voter's change of name;(ii)on at least a weekly basis, the information described in Subsection 26B-8-114(11) from the state registrar, regarding deceased individuals;(iii)on at least a monthly basis, the information described in Subsection (3), received from the Department of Corrections regarding incarcerated individuals;(iv)on at least a monthly basis, information received from other states, including information received under an agreement described in Subsection (2); and(v)within 31 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor receives information relevant to voter registration, other than the information described in Subsections (1)(b)(i) through (iv);(c)regularly monitor the system to ensure that each county clerk complies with the requirements of this part and rules made under Section 20A-2-507;(d)establish matching criteria and security measures for identifying a change described in Subsection (1)(b) to ensure the accuracy of a voter registration record;(e)on at least a monthly basis:(i)use the matching criteria and security measures described in Subsection (1)(d) to compare information in the database to identify duplicate data, contradictory data, and changes in data;(ii)notify the applicable county clerk of the data identified; and(iii)notify the county clerk of the county in which a voter's principal place of residence is located of a change in a registered voter's principal place of residence or name;(f)before April 1, 2026, develop a procedure to evaluate voter registration based on addresses to identify potential anomalies, including eight or more voters at a single-family home address;(g)develop procedures to investigate the validity of a voter registration when a ballot mailed by the county clerk is returned by the post office as undeliverable;(h)before June 1, 2026, register with the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements program, operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security; and(i)as part of maintaining the voter registration database, analyze the database at least 90 calendar days before the day of each regular primary election and each regular general election to ensure the accuracy of the voter registration record, and to inform county clerks of action needed, by identifying errors in the database, including errors based on:(i)change of incarceration status;(ii)the death of a voter;(iii)duplicate voters;(iv)identical identification numbers used by multiple voters; or(v)other reasons identified by the lieutenant governor that would render a voter ineligible to vote.(2)(a)Subject to Subsection (2)(b), the lieutenant governor may cooperate or enter into an agreement with a governmental entity or another state to share information and increase the accuracy of the database.(b)For a record shared under Subsection (2)(a), the lieutenant governor shall ensure:(i)that the record is only used to maintain the accuracy of the database;(ii)compliance with Section 63G-2-206; and(iii)that the record is secure from unauthorized use by employing data encryption or another similar technology security system.(c)The lieutenant governor is not required to comply with an updating requirement described in Subsection (1)(b) to the extent that the person responsible to provide the information to the lieutenant governor fails to provide the information.(3)(a)The lieutenant governor shall maintain a current list of all incarcerated felons in Utah.(b)The Department of Corrections shall provide the lieutenant governor's office with:(i)the name and last-known address of each individual who:(A)was convicted of a felony in a Utah state court; and(B)is currently incarcerated for commission of a felony; and(ii)the name of each convicted felon who has been released from incarceration.(4)The lieutenant governor shall seek to enter into an agreement with the federal courts to provide that, in exchange for receiving information from the state's voter registration list or from a list maintained by the Driver License Division to use in relation to federal juries, the federal courts will notify the lieutenant governor or a county clerk when an individual disclosed from one of the lists is disqualified from jury service due to a conviction or non-citizenship.(5)The lieutenant governor shall maintain on the lieutenant governor's website a document that:(a)describes the utilities and tools within the system that a county clerk is required to run;(b)describes the actions, if any, that a county clerk is required to take in relation to the results of running a utility or tool;(c)lists, by date, the recurring deadlines by which a county clerk must comply with Subsection (5)(a) or (b); and(d)indicates, by county:(i)whether the county clerk timely complies with each deadline described in Subsection (5)(c); and(ii)if the county clerk fails to timely comply with a deadline described in Subsection (5)(c), whether the county clerk subsequently complies with the deadline and the date on which the county clerk complies.(6)The lieutenant governor or the legislative auditor general may contract with a third-party that specializes in voter registration maintenance to assist in the review and identification of inaccuracies in records within the voter registration database, if the third-party:(a)utilizes advanced data analytics to analyze as many data points as possible, including:(i)driver license records;(ii)property tax records;(iii)vital records;(iv)Medicaid application records; and(v)other relevant records; and(b)maintains:(i)a primary data center and at least one backup data center in separate geographic regions;(ii)a disaster recovery plan that guarantees complete resumption of service within an agreed upon time period in the event of a disaster that compromises the availability of the system; and(iii)security measures that comply with standards established by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.